Illinois, session 104th, HB3139.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearm Owners Identification Card Act is 5amended by changing Sections 5, 7, 13.2, and 14 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 65/5)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-5)7    Sec. 5. Application and renewal. 8    (a) The Illinois State Police shall either approve or deny 9all applications within 30 days from the date they are 10received, except as provided in subsections (b) and (c), and 11every applicant found qualified under Section 8 of this Act by 12the Illinois State Police shall be entitled to a Firearm 13Owner's Identification Card upon the payment of a $10 fee and 14applicable processing fees. The processing fees shall be 15limited to charges by the State Treasurer for using the 16electronic online payment system. Any applicant who is an 17active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States, a 18member of the Illinois National Guard, or a member of the 19Reserve Forces of the United States is exempt from the 20application fee. $5 of each fee derived from the issuance of a 21Firearm Owner's Identification Card or renewals thereof shall 22be deposited in the State Police Firearm Services Fund and $5 23into the State Police Firearm Enforcement Fund.  HB3139- 2 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1    (b) (Blank). Renewal applications shall be approved or 2denied within 60 business days, provided the applicant 3submitted his or her renewal application prior to the 4expiration of his or her Firearm Owner's Identification Card. 5If a renewal application has been submitted prior to the 6expiration date of the applicant's Firearm Owner's 7Identification Card, the Firearm Owner's Identification Card 8shall remain valid while the Illinois State Police processes 9the application, unless the person is subject to or becomes 10subject to revocation under this Act. The cost for a renewal 11application shall be $10 and may include applicable processing 12fees, which shall be limited to charges by the State Treasurer 13for using the electronic online payment system, which shall be 14deposited into the State Police Firearm Services Fund.15    (c) If the Firearm Owner's Identification Card of a 16licensee under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act expires during 17the term of the licensee's concealed carry license, the 18Firearm Owner's Identification Card and the license remain 19valid and the licensee does not have to renew his or her 20Firearm Owner's Identification Card during the duration of the 21concealed carry license. Unless the Illinois State Police has 22reason to believe the licensee is no longer eligible for the 23card, the Illinois State Police may automatically renew the 24licensee's Firearm Owner's Identification Card and send a 25renewed Firearm Owner's Identification Card to the licensee.26    (d) The Illinois State Police may adopt rules concerning   HB3139- 3 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1the use of voluntarily submitted fingerprints, as allowed by 2State and federal law. 3(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 4102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-609, eff. 7-1-24.) 5    (430 ILCS 65/7)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-7)6    Sec. 7. Validity of Firearm Owner's Identification Card. 7    (a) Except as provided in Section 8 of this Act or 8elsewhere in this Section, a Firearm Owner's Identification 9Card issued under the provisions of this Act shall be valid for 10the person to whom it is issued for the Card holder's lifetime. 11A Firearm Owner's Identification Card issued before the 12effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 13Assembly shall be valid during the Card holder's lifetime 14regardless of the expiration date on the Card a period of 10 15years from the date of issuance. Unless the person no longer 16meets the requirements or becomes subject to suspension or 17revocation under this Act, a card issued under an application 18made as provided in subsection (a-25) of Section 4 shall 19remain valid if the person meets the requirements of 20subsection (b-5) of Section 3.1. 21    (b) (Blank). If a renewal application is submitted to the 22Department before the expiration date of the applicant's 23current Firearm Owner's Identification Card, the Firearm 24Owner's Identification Card shall remain valid, unless the 25person is subject to or becomes subject to revocation under   HB3139- 4 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1this Act. Unless the person no longer meets the requirements 2or becomes subject to suspension or revocation under this Act, 3a card issued under a renewal application made as provided in 4subsection (a-25) of Section 4 shall remain valid if the 5person meets the implementation requirements of Section 3.1.6    (c) Beginning January 1, 2022, if the Firearm Owner's 7Identification Card of a licensee under the Firearm Concealed 8Carry Act expires during the term of the licensee's concealed 9carry license, the Firearm Owner's Identification Card and the 10license remain valid during the validity of the concealed 11carry license and the licensee does not have to renew his or 12her Firearm Owner's Identification Card, if the Firearm 13Owner's Identification Card has not been otherwise renewed as 14provided in this Act. Unless the Illinois State Police has 15reason to believe the licensee is no longer eligible for the 16card, the Illinois State Police may automatically renew the 17licensee's Firearm Owner's Identification Card.18(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22.) 19    (430 ILCS 65/13.2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-13.2)20    Sec. 13.2. Name Renewal; name, photograph, or address 21change; replacement card. The Illinois State Police shall, 180 22days prior to the expiration of a Firearm Owner's 23Identification Card, forward by first class mail or by other 24means provided in Section 7.5 to each person whose card is to 25expire a notification of the expiration of the card and   HB3139- 5 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1instructions for renewal. It is the obligation of the holder 2of a Firearm Owner's Identification Card to notify the 3Illinois State Police of any address change since the issuance 4of the Firearm Owner's Identification Card. The Illinois State 5Police may update the applicant and card holder's address 6based upon records in the Secretary of State Driver's License 7or Illinois identification card records of applicants who do 8not have driver's licenses. Any person whose legal name has 9changed from the name on the card that he or she has been 10previously issued must apply for a corrected card within 30 11calendar days after the change. The cost for an updated or 12corrected card shall be $5. The cost for replacement of a card 13which has been lost, destroyed, or stolen shall be $5 if the 14loss, destruction, or theft of the card is reported to the 15Illinois State Police. The fees collected under this Section 16shall be deposited into the State Police Firearm Services 17Fund. 18(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 19102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 20    (430 ILCS 65/14)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-14)21    Sec. 14. Sentence. 22    (a) Until the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 23104th General Assembly, except Except as provided in 24subsection (a-5), a violation of paragraph (1) of subsection 25(a) of Section 2, when the person's Firearm Owner's   HB3139- 6 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1Identification Card is expired but the person is not otherwise 2disqualified from renewing the card, is a Class A misdemeanor.3    (a-5) Until the effective date of this amendatory Act of 4the 104th General Assembly, a A violation of paragraph (1) of 5subsection (a) of Section 2, when the person's Firearm Owner's 6Identification Card is expired but the person is not otherwise 7disqualified from owning, purchasing, or possessing firearms, 8is a petty offense if the card was expired for 6 months or less 9from the date of expiration. 10    (b) Except as provided in subsection (a) with respect to 11an expired card, a violation of paragraph (1) of subsection 12(a) of Section 2 is a Class A misdemeanor when the person does 13not possess a currently valid Firearm Owner's Identification 14Card, but is otherwise eligible under this Act. A second or 15subsequent violation is a Class 4 felony.16    (c) A violation of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of 17Section 2 is a Class 3 felony when: 18        (1) the person's Firearm Owner's Identification Card 19    is revoked or subject to revocation under Section 8; or 20        (2) until the effective date of this amendatory Act of 21    the 104th General Assembly, the person's Firearm Owner's 22    Identification Card is expired and not otherwise eligible 23    for renewal under this Act; or 24        (3) the person does not possess a currently valid 25    Firearm Owner's Identification Card, and the person is not 26    otherwise eligible under this Act.  HB3139- 7 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1    (d) A violation of subsection (a) of Section 3 is a Class 4 2felony. A third or subsequent conviction is a Class 1 felony.3    (d-5) Any person who knowingly enters false information on 4an application for a Firearm Owner's Identification Card, who 5knowingly gives a false answer to any question on the 6application, or who knowingly submits false evidence in 7connection with an application is guilty of a Class 2 felony.8    (e) Except as provided by Section 6.1 of this Act, any 9other violation of this Act is a Class A misdemeanor.10(Source: P.A. 97-1131, eff. 1-1-13.) 11    Section 10. The Firearm Concealed Carry Act is amended by 12changing Sections 10, 45, 50, 60, 70, and 75 as follows: 13    (430 ILCS 66/10)14    Sec. 10. Issuance of licenses to carry a concealed 15firearm. 16    (a) The Illinois State Police shall issue a license to 17carry a concealed firearm under this Act to an applicant who:18        (1) meets the qualifications of Section 25 of this 19    Act;20        (2) has provided the application and documentation 21    required in Section 30 of this Act; 22        (3) has submitted the requisite fees; and23        (4) does not pose a danger to himself, herself, or 24    others, or a threat to public safety as determined by the   HB3139- 8 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1    Concealed Carry Licensing Review Board in accordance with 2    Section 20.3    (b) The Illinois State Police shall issue a renewal, 4corrected, or duplicate license as provided in this Act.5    (c) A license shall be valid throughout the State for a 6period of 5 years from the date of issuance. A license shall 7permit the licensee to:8        (1) carry a loaded or unloaded concealed firearm, 9    fully concealed or partially concealed, on or about his or 10    her person; and 11        (2) keep or carry a loaded or unloaded concealed 12    firearm on or about his or her person within a vehicle.13    (d) The Illinois State Police shall make applications for 14a license available no later than 180 days after July 9, 2013 15(the effective date of this Act). The Illinois State Police 16shall establish rules for the availability and submission of 17applications in accordance with this Act.18    (e) An application for a license submitted to the Illinois 19State Police that contains all the information and materials 20required by this Act, including the requisite fee, shall be 21deemed completed. Except as otherwise provided in this Act, no 22later than 90 days after receipt of a completed application, 23the Illinois State Police shall issue or deny the applicant a 24license. The Illinois State Police shall notify the applicant 25for a concealed carry license electronically to confirm if all 26the required information and materials have been received. If   HB3139- 9 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1an applicant for a concealed carry license submits his or her 2application electronically, the Illinois State Police shall 3notify the applicant electronically if his or her application 4is missing information or materials.5    (f) The Illinois State Police shall deny the applicant a 6license if the applicant fails to meet the requirements under 7this Act or the Illinois State Police receives a determination 8from the Board that the applicant is ineligible for a license. 9The Illinois State Police must notify the applicant stating 10the grounds for the denial. The notice of denial must inform 11the applicant of his or her right to an appeal through 12administrative and judicial review.13    (g) A licensee shall possess a license at all times the 14licensee carries a concealed firearm except:15        (1) when the licensee is carrying or possessing a 16    concealed firearm on his or her land or in his or her 17    abode, legal dwelling, or fixed place of business, or on 18    the land or in the legal dwelling of another person as an 19    invitee with that person's permission;20        (2) when the person is authorized to carry a firearm 21    under Section 24-2 of the Criminal Code of 2012, except 22    subsection (a-5) of that Section; or23        (3) when the handgun is broken down in a 24    non-functioning state, is not immediately accessible, or 25    is unloaded and enclosed in a case.26    (h) If an officer of a law enforcement agency initiates an   HB3139- 10 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1investigative stop, including, but not limited to, a traffic 2stop, of a licensee or a non-resident carrying a concealed 3firearm under subsection (e) of Section 40 of this Act, upon 4the request of the officer the licensee or non-resident shall 5disclose to the officer that he or she is in possession of a 6concealed firearm under this Act, or present the license upon 7the request of the officer if he or she is a licensee or 8present upon the request of the officer evidence under 9paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Section 40 of this Act that 10he or she is a non-resident qualified to carry under that 11subsection. The disclosure requirement under this subsection 12(h) is satisfied if the licensee presents his or her license to 13the officer or the non-resident presents to the officer 14evidence under paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Section 40 15of this Act that he or she is qualified to carry under that 16subsection. Upon the request of the officer, the licensee or 17non-resident shall also identify the location of the concealed 18firearm and permit the officer to safely secure the firearm 19for the duration of the investigative stop. During a traffic 20stop, any passenger within the vehicle who is a licensee or a 21non-resident carrying under subsection (e) of Section 40 of 22this Act must comply with the requirements of this subsection 23(h). 24    (h-1) If a licensee carrying a firearm or a non-resident 25carrying a firearm in a vehicle under subsection (e) of 26Section 40 of this Act is contacted by a law enforcement   HB3139- 11 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1officer or emergency services personnel, the law enforcement 2officer or emergency services personnel may secure the firearm 3or direct that it be secured during the duration of the contact 4if the law enforcement officer or emergency services personnel 5determines that it is necessary for the safety of any person 6present, including the law enforcement officer or emergency 7services personnel. The licensee or nonresident shall submit 8to the order to secure the firearm. When the law enforcement 9officer or emergency services personnel have determined that 10the licensee or non-resident is not a threat to the safety of 11any person present, including the law enforcement officer or 12emergency services personnel, and if the licensee or 13non-resident is physically and mentally capable of possessing 14the firearm, the law enforcement officer or emergency services 15personnel shall return the firearm to the licensee or 16non-resident before releasing him or her from the scene and 17breaking contact. If the licensee or non-resident is 18transported for treatment to another location, the firearm 19shall be turned over to any peace officer. The peace officer 20shall provide a receipt which includes the make, model, 21caliber, and serial number of the firearm. 22    (i) The Illinois State Police shall maintain a database of 23license applicants and licensees. The database shall be 24available to all federal, State, and local law enforcement 25agencies, State's Attorneys, the Attorney General, and 26authorized court personnel. Within 180 days after July 9, 2013   HB3139- 12 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1(the effective date of this Act), the database shall be 2searchable and provide all information included in the 3application, including the applicant's previous addresses 4within the 10 years prior to the license application and any 5information related to violations of this Act. No law 6enforcement agency, State's Attorney, Attorney General, or 7member or staff of the judiciary shall provide any information 8to a requester who is not entitled to it by law.9    (j) No later than 10 days after receipt of a completed 10application, the Illinois State Police shall enter the 11relevant information about the applicant into the database 12under subsection (i) of this Section which is accessible by 13law enforcement agencies.14    (k) The Illinois State Police shall continuously monitor 15relevant State and federal databases for firearms prohibitors 16and correlate those records with concealed carry license 17holders to ensure compliance with this Act, or State and 18federal law. The Illinois State Police may adopt rules to 19implement this subsection. 20(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 21102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 22    (430 ILCS 66/45)23    Sec. 45. Civil immunity; Board, employees, and agents. The 24Board, Illinois State Police, local law enforcement agency, or 25the employees and agents of the Board, Illinois State Police,   HB3139- 13 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1or local law enforcement agency participating in the licensing 2process under this Act shall not be held liable for damages in 3any civil action arising from alleged wrongful or improper 4granting, denying, renewing, revoking, suspending, or failing 5to grant, deny, renew, revoke, or suspend a license under this 6Act, except for willful or wanton misconduct.7(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 8    (430 ILCS 66/50)9    Sec. 50. Lifetime license License renewal. 10    (a) A license shall be valid during the licensee's 11lifetime. A license issued before the effective date of this 12amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly shall be valid 13during the licensee's lifetime regardless of the expiration 14date on the license. This subsection (a) applies through the 15180th day following July 12, 2019 (the effective date of 16Public Act 101-80). The Illinois State Police shall, 180 days 17prior to the expiration of a concealed carry license, notify 18each person whose license is to expire a notification of the 19expiration of the license and instructions for renewal. 20Applications for renewal of a license shall be made to the 21Illinois State Police. A license shall be renewed for a period 22of 5 years upon receipt of a completed renewal application, 23completion of 3 hours of training required under Section 75 of 24this Act, payment of the applicable renewal fee, and 25completion of an investigation under Section 35 of this Act.   HB3139- 14 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1The renewal application shall contain the information required 2in Section 30 of this Act, except that the applicant need not 3resubmit a full set of fingerprints.4    (b) (Blank). This subsection (b) applies on and after the 5181st day following July 12, 2019 (the effective date of 6Public Act 101-80). Applications for renewal of a license 7shall be made to the Illinois State Police. A license shall be 8renewed for a period of 5 years from the date of expiration on 9the applicant's current license upon the receipt of a 10completed renewal application, completion of 3 hours of 11training required under Section 75 of this Act, payment of the 12applicable renewal fee, and completion of an investigation 13under Section 35 of this Act. The renewal application shall 14contain the information required in Section 30 of this Act, 15except that the applicant need not resubmit a full set of 16fingerprints. 17(Source: P.A. 101-80, eff. 7-12-19; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 18102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 19    (430 ILCS 66/60)20    Sec. 60. Fees. 21    (a) All fees collected under this Act shall be deposited 22as provided in this Section. Application, renewal, and 23replacement fees shall be non-refundable.24    (b) An applicant for a new license or a renewal shall 25submit $150 with the application, of which $120 shall be   HB3139- 15 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1apportioned to the State Police Firearm Services Fund, $20 2shall be apportioned to the Mental Health Reporting Fund, and 3$10 shall be apportioned to the State Crime Laboratory Fund.4    (c) A non-resident applicant for a new license or renewal 5shall submit $300 with the application, of which $250 shall be 6apportioned to the State Police Firearm Services Fund, $40 7shall be apportioned to the Mental Health Reporting Fund, and 8$10 shall be apportioned to the State Crime Laboratory Fund.9    (d) A licensee requesting a new license replacement in 10accordance with Section 55 shall submit $75, of which $60 11shall be apportioned to the State Police Firearm Services 12Fund, $5 shall be apportioned to the Mental Health Reporting 13Fund, and $10 shall be apportioned to the State Crime 14Laboratory Fund.15(Source: P.A. 98-63, eff. 7-9-13.) 16    (430 ILCS 66/70)17    Sec. 70. Violations. 18    (a) A license issued or renewed under this Act shall be 19revoked if, at any time, the licensee is found to be ineligible 20for a license under this Act or the licensee no longer meets 21the eligibility requirements of the Firearm Owners 22Identification Card Act.23    (b) A license shall be suspended if an order of 24protection, including an emergency order of protection, 25plenary order of protection, or interim order of protection   HB3139- 16 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1under Article 112A of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 or 2under the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, or if a 3firearms restraining order, including an emergency firearms 4restraining order, under the Firearms Restraining Order Act, 5is issued against a licensee for the duration of the order, or 6if the Illinois State Police is made aware of a similar order 7issued against the licensee in any other jurisdiction. If an 8order of protection is issued against a licensee, the licensee 9shall surrender the license, as applicable, to the court at 10the time the order is entered or to the law enforcement agency 11or entity serving process at the time the licensee is served 12the order. The court, law enforcement agency, or entity 13responsible for serving the order of protection shall notify 14the Illinois State Police within 7 days and transmit the 15license to the Illinois State Police.16    (c) (Blank). A license is invalid upon expiration of the 17license, unless the licensee has submitted an application to 18renew the license, and the applicant is otherwise eligible to 19possess a license under this Act.20    (d) A licensee shall not carry a concealed firearm while 21under the influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, 22intoxicating compound or combination of compounds, or any 23combination thereof, under the standards set forth in 24subsection (a) of Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.25    A licensee in violation of this subsection (d) shall be 26guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for a first or second violation   HB3139- 17 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1and a Class 4 felony for a third violation. The Illinois State 2Police may suspend a license for up to 6 months for a second 3violation and shall permanently revoke a license for a third 4violation.5    (e) Except as otherwise provided, a licensee in violation 6of this Act shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor. A second 7or subsequent violation is a Class A misdemeanor. The Illinois 8State Police may suspend a license for up to 6 months for a 9second violation and shall permanently revoke a license for 3 10or more violations of Section 65 of this Act. Any person 11convicted of a violation under this Section shall pay a $150 12fee to be deposited into the Mental Health Reporting Fund, 13plus any applicable court costs or fees.14    (f) A licensee convicted or found guilty of a violation of 15this Act who has a valid license and is otherwise eligible to 16carry a concealed firearm shall only be subject to the 17penalties under this Section and shall not be subject to the 18penalties under Section 21-6, paragraph (4), (8), or (10) of 19subsection (a) of Section 24-1, or subparagraph (A-5) or (B-5) 20of paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1.6 of the 21Criminal Code of 2012. Except as otherwise provided in this 22subsection, nothing in this subsection prohibits the licensee 23from being subjected to penalties for violations other than 24those specified in this Act.25    (g) A licensee whose license is revoked, suspended, or 26denied shall, within 48 hours of receiving notice of the   HB3139- 18 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1revocation, suspension, or denial, surrender his or her 2concealed carry license to the local law enforcement agency 3where the person resides. The local law enforcement agency 4shall provide the licensee a receipt and transmit the 5concealed carry license to the Illinois State Police. If the 6licensee whose concealed carry license has been revoked, 7suspended, or denied fails to comply with the requirements of 8this subsection, the law enforcement agency where the person 9resides may petition the circuit court to issue a warrant to 10search for and seize the concealed carry license in the 11possession and under the custody or control of the licensee 12whose concealed carry license has been revoked, suspended, or 13denied. The observation of a concealed carry license in the 14possession of a person whose license has been revoked, 15suspended, or denied constitutes a sufficient basis for the 16arrest of that person for violation of this subsection. A 17violation of this subsection is a Class A misdemeanor.18    (h) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (h-5), a 19license issued or renewed under this Act shall be revoked if, 20at any time, the licensee is found ineligible for a Firearm 21Owner's Identification Card, or the licensee no longer 22possesses a valid Firearm Owner's Identification Card. If the 23Firearm Owner's Identification Card is expired or suspended 24rather than denied or revoked, the license may be suspended 25for a period of up to one year to allow the licensee to 26reinstate his or her Firearm Owner's Identification Card. The   HB3139- 19 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1Illinois State Police shall adopt rules to enforce this 2subsection. A licensee whose license is revoked under this 3subsection (h) shall surrender his or her concealed carry 4license as provided for in subsection (g) of this Section. 5    This subsection shall not apply to a person who has filed 6an application with the Illinois State Police for renewal of a 7Firearm Owner's Identification Card and who is not otherwise 8ineligible to obtain a Firearm Owner's Identification Card.9    (h-5) If the Firearm Owner's Identification Card of a 10licensee under this Act expires during the term of the license 11issued under this Act, the license and the Firearm Owner's 12Identification Card remain valid, and the Illinois State 13Police may automatically renew the licensee's Firearm Owner's 14Identification Card as provided in subsection (c) of Section 5 15of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.16    (i) A certified firearms instructor who knowingly provides 17or offers to provide a false certification that an applicant 18has completed firearms training as required under this Act is 19guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. A person guilty of a violation 20of this subsection (i) is not eligible for court supervision. 21The Illinois State Police shall permanently revoke the 22firearms instructor certification of a person convicted under 23this subsection (i). 24(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 25102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)   HB3139- 20 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1    (430 ILCS 66/75)2    Sec. 75. Applicant firearm training. 3    (a) Within 60 days of the effective date of this Act, the 4Illinois State Police shall begin approval of firearm training 5courses and shall make a list of approved courses available on 6the Illinois State Police's website.7    (b) An applicant for a new license shall provide proof of 8completion of a firearms training course or combination of 9courses approved by the Illinois State Police of at least 16 10hours, which includes range qualification time under 11subsection (c) of this Section, that covers the following:12        (1) firearm safety;13        (2) the basic principles of marksmanship;14        (3) care, cleaning, loading, and unloading of a 15    concealable firearm;16        (4) all applicable State and federal laws relating to 17    the ownership, storage, carry, and transportation of a 18    firearm; and19        (5) instruction on the appropriate and lawful 20    interaction with law enforcement while transporting or 21    carrying a concealed firearm.22    (c) An applicant for a new license shall provide proof of 23certification by a certified instructor that the applicant 24passed a live fire exercise with a concealable firearm 25consisting of:26        (1) a minimum of 30 rounds; and  HB3139- 21 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1        (2) 10 rounds from a distance of 5 yards; 10 rounds 2    from a distance of 7 yards; and 10 rounds from a distance 3    of 10 yards at a B-27 silhouette target approved by the 4    Illinois State Police.5    (d) (Blank). An applicant for renewal of a license shall 6provide proof of completion of a firearms training course or 7combination of courses approved by the Illinois State Police 8of at least 3 hours.9    (e) A certificate of completion for an applicant's firearm 10training course shall not be issued to a student who:11        (1) does not follow the orders of the certified 12    firearms instructor; 13        (2) in the judgment of the certified instructor, 14    handles a firearm in a manner that poses a danger to the 15    student or to others; or 16        (3) during the range firing portion of testing fails 17    to hit the target with 70% of the rounds fired.18    (f) An instructor shall maintain a record of each 19student's performance for at least 5 years, and shall make all 20records available upon demand of authorized personnel of the 21Illinois State Police.22    (g) The Illinois State Police and certified firearms 23instructors shall recognize up to 8 hours of training already 24completed toward the 16 hour training requirement under this 25Section if the training course is submitted to and approved by 26the Illinois State Police. Any remaining hours that the   HB3139- 22 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1applicant completes must at least cover the classroom subject 2matter of paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of this Section, and 3the range qualification in subsection (c) of this Section.4    (h) A person who has qualified to carry a firearm as an 5active law enforcement or corrections officer, who has 6successfully completed firearms training as required by his or 7her law enforcement agency and is authorized by his or her 8agency to carry a firearm; a person currently certified as a 9firearms instructor by this Act or by the Illinois Law 10Enforcement Training Standards Board; or a person who has 11completed the required training and has been issued a firearm 12control card by the Department of Financial and Professional 13Regulation shall be exempt from the requirements of this 14Section.15    (i) The Illinois State Police and certified firearms 16instructors shall recognize 8 hours of training as completed 17toward the 16 hour training requirement under this Section, if 18the applicant is an active, retired, or honorably discharged 19member of the United States Armed Forces. Any remaining hours 20that the applicant completes must at least cover the classroom 21subject matter of paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of this 22Section, and the range qualification in subsection (c) of this 23Section. 24    (j) The Illinois State Police and certified firearms 25instructors shall recognize up to 8 hours of training already 26completed toward the 16 hour training requirement under this   HB3139- 23 -LRB104 05033 BDA 15061 b1Section if the training course is approved by the Illinois 2State Police and was completed in connection with the 3applicant's previous employment as a law enforcement or 4corrections officer. Any remaining hours that the applicant 5completes must at least cover the classroom subject matter of 6paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of this Section, and the range 7qualification in subsection (c) of this Section. A former law 8enforcement or corrections officer seeking credit under this 9subsection (j) shall provide evidence that he or she separated 10from employment in good standing from each law enforcement 11agency where he or she was employed. An applicant who was 12discharged from a law enforcement agency for misconduct or 13disciplinary reasons is not eligible for credit under this 14subsection (j). 15(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)